Maryland, session 2025, HB0366.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
3–8A–27.
(a) (1) (I) A police record concerning a child is confidential and shall be
maintained separate from those of adults. [Its]
(II) THE contents OF A POLICE RECORD CONCERNING A CHILD
may not be divulged, by subpoena or otherwise, except by order of the court upon good cause
shown or as otherwise provided in § 7–303 of the Education Article.
(2) This subsection does not prohibit:
(i) Access to and confidential use of the record by the Department of
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0366*

HOUSE BILL 366
Juvenile Services or in the investigation and prosecution of the child by any law
enforcement agency;
(ii) Access to and confidential use of the record by the Baltimore City
Mayor’s Office on Criminal Justice if the Baltimore City Mayor’s Office on Criminal Justice
is providing programs and services to a child who is the subject of the record, for a purpose
relevant to the provisions of the programs and services and the development of a
comprehensive treatment plan;
(iii) A law enforcement agency of the State or of a political subdivision
of the State, the Department of Juvenile Services, or the criminal justice information
system from including in the law enforcement computer information system information
about:
1. An outstanding juvenile court ordered writ of attachment
or an outstanding criminal court ordered writ of attachment, for the sole purpose of
apprehending a child named in the writ;
2. An outstanding criminal court issued warrant, for the sole
purpose of apprehending a child named in the warrant; or
3. A missing child as defined in § 9–401 of the Family Law
Article; [or]
(iv) A law enforcement agency of the State or of a political subdivision
of the State, when necessary and for the sole purposes of facilitating apprehension of a child
and ensuring public safety, from releasing to the public photographs and identifying
information of a child who:
1. Has escaped from:
A. A detention center for juveniles;
B. A secure residential facility for juveniles; or
C. A correctional unit as defined in § 2–401 of the
Correctional Services Article;
2. Is a missing child as defined in § 9–401 of the Family Law
Article; or
3. The court does not have jurisdiction over pursuant to §
3–8A–03(d)(1), (4), or (5) of this subtitle and who is subject to:
A. Arrest; or
B. An arrest warrant issued by a criminal court; OR

HOUSE BILL 366 3
(V) IN RELATION TO AN INDEPENDENT INVESTIGATION UNDER
§ 6–602 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE OF A POLICE–INVOLVED INCIDENT
RESULTING IN THE DEATH OR INJURY OF A CHILD, AND ONLY WITH THE EXPRESS
CONSENT OF THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF THE CHILD, THE OFFICE OF THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL FROM RELEASING TO THE PUBLIC THE NAME AND AGE OF THE
CHILD.
(3) The Baltimore City Mayor’s Office on Criminal Justice shall be liable
for the unauthorized release of a police record it accesses under this subsection.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.